Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.040

Creation of district—Public hearing—Notice—Contents.

Notice of the public hearing shall be published in at least two consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed lake or beach management district, the date of the first publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the public hearing by the resolution of intention. Notice of the public hearing shall also be given to the owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed lake or beach management district by mailing the notice at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public hearing to the owner or reputed owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county assessor at the address shown thereon. Notice of the public hearing shall also be mailed to the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public hearing.

Notices of the public hearing shall: (1) Refer to the resolution of intention; (2) designate the proposed lake or beach management district by number; (3) set forth a proposed plan describing: (a) The nature of the proposed lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities; (b) the amount of special assessments or rates and charges proposed to be raised by the lake or beach management district; (c) if special assessments are proposed to be imposed, whether the special assessments will be imposed annually for the duration of the lake or beach management district, or the full special assessments will be payable at one time, with the possibility of periodic installments being paid and lake or beach management bonds being issued, or both; (d) if rates and charges are proposed to be imposed, the annual amount of revenue proposed to be collected and whether revenue bonds payable from the rates and charges are proposed to be issued; and (e) the proposed duration of the lake or beach management district; and (4) indicate the date, time, and place of the public hearing designated in the resolution of intention.

In the case of the notice sent to each owner or reputed owner by mail, the notice shall set forth the estimated amount of the cost of the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities to be borne by special assessment, or annual special assessments, or rates and charges on the lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property owned by the owner or reputed owner.

If the county legislative authority has designated a committee of itself or an officer to hear complaints and make recommendations to the full county legislative authority, as provided in RCW 36.61.060, the notice shall also describe this additional step before the full county legislative authority may adopt a resolution creating the lake or beach management district.

[ 2008 c 301 s 6; 1994 c 264 s 9; 1988 c 36 s 9; 1987 c 432 s 4; 1985 c 398 s 4.]